Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 15

Administrative Procedures

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 664, § 5: Mar. 30, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that there is an immediate need to provide qualified interpreters for deaf persons at administrative, civil and criminal proceedings and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 312, § 5: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 5, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is necessary to clarify the authority granted by the legislative branch of government to the judicial branch of government, and that this Act is in keeping with the separation of powers provision of Section 2 of Article 4 of the Arkansas Constitution, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 469, § 7: Mar. 12, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to protect the confidentiality of privileged communications between qualified interpreters for deaf and hearing-impaired persons occurring at administrative, civil and criminal proceedings and that this act is immediately necessary. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 788, § 2: July 1, 2018.